Oklahoma, session 2026, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 7-602, as
amended by Section 88, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 7-602), is amended to read as follows:
Section 7-602. A. 1. The owner of a motor vehicle registered
in this state shall carry in the vehicle at all times a current
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 1

owne r's security verification form listing the vehicle or an
equivalent form which has been issued by the Department of Public
Safety, and the operator of the vehicle shall produce the form upon
request for inspection by any law enforcement officer or
representative of the Department and, in case of an accident, the
form shall be shown upon request to any person affected by the
accident.
2. a. Every person registering a motor vehicle in this
state, except a motor vehicle which is not being used
upon the public highways or public streets, or a
manufactured home while on a permanent foundation, at
the time of registration of the vehicle, shall certify
the existence of security with respect to the vehicle
by providing to a licensed operator or other
registering agency necessary information from the
current owner's security verification in a manner that
allows verification of coverage through the online
verification system. The information shall include
the name or number issued by the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners of the current insurance
carrier authorized to do business in this state and
the policy number applicable to the vehicle being
registered. A licensed operator or other registering
agency shall require the submission of the form or
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 2

other verifying information prior to processing an
application for registration or renewal.
b. Every licensed operator or other registering agency
shall use the online verification system to certify
the existence of security with respect to the vehicle
from an insurance carrier authorized to do business in
this state unless the online verification system is
not online or the required information is otherwise
not available, or the licensed operator determines, in
the exercise of reasonable discretion, that a physical
proof of insurance presented by the customer appears
valid and sufficient to demonstrate the existence of
the required security. In such a case, the licensed
operator or other registering agency may accept
verification as provided in subparagraph a of this
paragraph, physical proof of insurance presented by
the customer, or from a licensed insurance producer or
customer service representative to certify the
existence of the required insurance prior to
processing any application for motor vehicle
registration. Every licensed operator or other
registering agent shall allow submission of proof from
a licensed insurance producer or customer service
representative pursuant to this subparagraph via
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 3

electronic mail at no additional cost to the person
registering the vehicle.
3. Fleet vehicles operating under the authority of the
Corporation Commission, the Federal Highway Administration, or
vehicles registered pursuant to the provisions of Section 1120 of
this title, shall certify the existence of security with respect to
each vehicle at the time of registration by submitting one of the
following:
a. a current owner's security verification form verifying
the existence of security as required by the
Compulsory Insurance Law, or
b. a permit number verified by the Corporation Commission
indicating the existence of a current liability
insurance policy. Provided, in the event the
Corporation Commission is unable to verify the
existence of insurance as provided herein in a prompt
and timely fashion, the Corporation Commission may
accept a current single state registration form issued
by the Corporation Commission or any other regulating
entity with which the Corporation Commission has
entered into a reciprocal compact or agreement
regarding the regulation of motor vehicles engaged in
interstate or foreign commerce upon and over the
public highways.
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 4

4. The following shall not be required to carry an owner's or
operator's security verification form or an equivalent form from the
Department of Public Safety during operation of the vehicle and
shall not be required to surrender a security verification form for
vehicle registration purposes:
a. any vehicle owned or leased by the federal or state
government, or any agency or political subdivision
thereof,
b. any vehicle bearing the name, symbol, or logo of a
business, corporation or utility on the exterior and
which is in compliance with the provisions of the
Compulsory Insurance Law according to records of the
Corporation Commission which reflect a deposit or
fleet policy,
c. fleet vehicles maintaining current vehicle liability
insurance as required by the Corporation Commission or
any other regulating entity,
d. any licensed taxicab, and
e. any vehicle owned by a licensed used motor vehicle
dealer.
5. Any person who knowingly issues or promulgates false or
fraudulent information in connection with either an owner's or
operator's security verification form or an equivalent form which
has been issued by the Department of Public Safety shall be guilty
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 5

of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine not
exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment for not
more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Each licensed operator is authorized to charge a fee of One
Dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) to each person to whom the licensed
operator issues a certificate of registration and who is required to
surrender proof of financial responsibility, or for whom the
licensed operator certifies the existence of financial
responsibility through an authorized online certification system,
pursuant to the provisions of the Compulsory Insurance Law. The fee
may be retained by the licensed operator as compensation for
services in processing the proof of financial responsibility and for
processing the driver license information, insurance verification
information, and other additional information furnished to the
licensed operator pursuant to Section 1112 of this title, if such
licensed operator does not receive the maximum compensation as
authorized by law.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026."






ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 6

Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate















ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 7

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 122 By: Haste of the Senate

and

Johns of the House


[ Department of Transportation - appropriation -
effective date -
emergency ]


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Weigh Station
Improvement Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 1167 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Nine Million
Dollars ($9,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to
perform the duties imposed upon the Department of Transportation by
law.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 1

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 122 Page 2